Louisiana, session 2026, SB377.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1657.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1657.1. Compensation; audits; contract and other requirements
A. As used in this Section:
(1) "Health plan" has the same meaning as the term is defined in R.S.
40:2863.
(2) "Insurer" means any health insurance issuer that is subject to state
law regulating insurance and offers health insurance coverage, as defined in 42
U.S.C. § 300gg-91, or any state or local governmental employer plan.
(3) "Person" includes a natural person, corporation, mutual company,
unincorporated association, partnership, joint venture, limited liability
company, trust, estate, foundation, not-for-profit corporation, unincorporated
Page 1 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-585 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 377
organization, government, or governmental subdivision or agency.
(4) "Pharmacy benefit management fee" means a fee that covers the cost
of providing one or more pharmacy benefit management services and that does
not exceed the value of the service or services actually performed by the
pharmacy benefit manager.
(5) "Pharmacy benefit management service" means:
(a) Negotiating the price of prescription drugs, including negotiating and
contracting for direct or indirect rebates, discounts, or other price concessions.
(b) Managing any aspect of a prescription drug benefit, including but not
limited to the processing and payment of claims for prescription drugs, the
performance of drug utilization review, the processing of drug prior
authorization requests, the adjudication of appeals or grievances related to the
prescription drug benefit, contracting with network pharmacies, controlling the
cost of covered prescription drugs, managing or providing data relating to the
prescription drug benefit, or the provision of services related thereto.
(c) Performing any administrative, managerial, clinical, pricing,
financial, reimbursement, data administration or reporting, or billing service.
(d) Such other services as the commissioner may define in regulation.
(6) "Pharmacy benefit manager" has the same meaning as the term
defined in R.S. 22:1641 and includes any person, either directly or indirectly,
that provides one or more pharmacy benefit management services on behalf of
an insurer or health plan, and any agent, contractor, intermediary, affiliate,
subsidiary, or related entity of such person who facilitates, provides, directs, or
oversees the provision of the pharmacy benefit management services.
(7) "Rebate" means:
(a) Negotiated price concessions including but not limited to base price
concessions, whether described as a rebate or otherwise and reasonable
estimates of any price protection rebates and performance-based price
concessions that may accrue directly or indirectly to the insurer or health plan,
Page 2 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-585 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 377
or other party on behalf of the insurer or health plan, including a pharmacy
benefit manager, during the coverage year from a manufacturer, dispensing
pharmacy, or other party in connection with the dispensing or administration
of a prescription drug.
(b) Reasonable estimates of any negotiated price concessions, fees, and
other administrative costs that are passed through, or are reasonably
anticipated to be passed through, to the insurer or health plan and serve to
reduce the insurer or health plan's liabilities for a prescription drug.
(8) "Related entity" means:
(a) Any entity, whether foreign or domestic, that is a member of any
controlled group of corporations as defined in section 1563(a) of the Internal
Revenue Code, except that fifty percent shall be substituted for eighty percent
wherever the latter percentage appears in the code of which a pharmacy benefit
manager is a member.
(b) Any of the following persons or entities that are treated as a related
entity to the extent provided in rules adopted by the commissioner:
(i) A person other than a corporation that is treated under the rules as
a related entity of a pharmacy benefit manager.
(ii) A person or entity that is treated under the rules as affiliated with a
pharmacy benefit manager in cases where the pharmacy benefit manager is a
person other than a corporation.
(9) "Unaffiliated pharmacy" means any dispensing pharmacy that is not
fractionally or wholly owned by, or a subsidiary or an affiliate of, a pharmacy
benefit manager.
B. PBM Compensation
(1) A pharmacy benefit manager may negotiate but not retain rebates
and fees, and may only derive income from pharmacy benefit management fees
for pharmacy benefit management services provided to an insurer or health
plan in this state. The amount of any pharmacy benefit management fees shall
Page 3 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-585 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 377
be set forth in the agreement between the pharmacy benefit manager and the
insurer or health plan.
(2) Pharmacy benefit management fees charged by or paid to a
pharmacy benefit manager by an insurer or health plan shall not be directly or
indirectly based or contingent upon:
(a) The acquisition cost or any other price metric of a drug.
(b) The amount of savings, rebates, or other fees charged, realized, or
collected by or generated based on the activity of the pharmacy benefit
manager.
(c) The amount of premiums, deductibles, or other cost-sharing or fees
charged, realized, or collected by the pharmacy benefit manager from patients
or other persons on behalf of a patient.
(3) Annually by December thirty-first, each pharmacy benefit manager
operating in the state shall certify to the commissioner of insurance that it has
fully and completely complied with the requirements of this Subsection
throughout the prior calendar year. The certification shall be signed by the chief
executive officer or chief financial officer of the pharmacy benefit manager.
C. PBM Audits
(1) The commissioner and any insurer or health plan contracted with a
pharmacy benefit manager holding a license issued by the commissioner of
insurance may audit the pharmacy benefit manager once per calendar year.
This audit right is in addition to, and shall not be construed to limit, any other
audit rights authorized by law or contract. As part of any audit, the
commissioner of insurance, insurer, or health plan may request information
including but not limited to the following:
(a) All reimbursement paid to retail pharmacies, on a claim level, for all
customers of the pharmacy benefit manager in the state, including drug-specific
reimbursement, dispensing fees, all rebates, other fees, ancillary charges,
clawbacks, or adjustments to reimbursement.
Page 4 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-585 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 377
(b) Any difference in reimbursement paid to affiliated pharmacies and
unaffiliated pharmacies, including differences in reimbursed ingredient costs
and dispensing fees.
(c) Historical claims data including ingredient cost, quantity, dispensing
fee, sales tax, usual and customary price, channel as either mail or retail,
insurer or health plan paid amount, days' supply, the amount paid by the
covered individual, formulary tier, acquisition cost, and any administrative fee
associated with the claim, as applicable.
(d) Aggregate rebate amounts received directly or indirectly from
manufacturers including from any other entity affiliated with or related to the
pharmacy benefit manager that negotiates or contracts with manufacturers,
such as group purchasing organizations and rebate aggregators, by calendar
quarter.
(2) The pharmacy benefit manager shall provide information pursuant
to Paragraph (1) of this Subsection within thirty days of its receipt of any
request from the commissioner of insurance, insurer, or health plan.
(3) The commissioner of insurance may dictate the form in which the
pharmacy benefit manager will provide information in response to an audit
under Paragraph (1) of this Subsection.
(4) The pharmacy benefit manager shall certify that all information
submitted to the commissioner or any insurer or health plan in accordance with
this Subsection is accurate and complete in all material respects. The
certification shall be signed by the chief executive officer or chief financial
officer of the pharmacy benefit manager.
(5) The commissioner and any insurer or health plan contracted with a
pharmacy benefit manager holding a license issued by the commissioner shall
not directly or indirectly publish or otherwise disclose any confidential,
proprietary information, including but not limited to any information that
would reveal the identity of a specific health plan or manufacturer, the price
Page 5 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-585 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 377
charged for a specific drug or class of drugs, for the amount of any rebates
provided for a specific drug or class of drugs, or that would otherwise have the
potential to compromise the financial, competitive, or proprietary nature of the
information. Any such information shall be protected from disclosure as
confidential and proprietary information, and shall not be regarded as a public
record under the Public Records Law. The commissioner and any insurer or
health plan contracted with a pharmacy benefit manager holding a license
issued by the department shall impose the confidentiality protections and
requirements of this Paragraph on any agent or downstream third party that
may receive or have access to this information.
D. PBM Contract and Other Requirements
A pharmacy benefit manager contract with an insurer or health plan
entered into, amended, extended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2027, shall:
(1) Specify all forms of revenue, including pharmacy benefit
management fees, to be paid by the insurer or health plan to the pharmacy
benefit manager.
(2) Acknowledge that spread pricing is not permitted in accordance with
R.S. 22:1867.
E. In addition to any other civil or criminal penalty authorized by law,
a violation of this Section shall be punishable by the commissioner through a
civil monetary penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars per claim.
F. In implementing the requirements of this Section, the state shall only
regulate a pharmacy benefit manager or insurer to the extent permissible under
applicable law.
Section 2. R.S. 22:1856(F) is hereby repealed.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
Page 6 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-585 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 377
effective on the day following such approval.